Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2502.01
General findings and declarations.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that: (1) All families have strengths; (2) families strengthen communities; (3) families are the primary decisionmakers for their children; and (4) all families have needs that change over time and require the support of their communities.

Laws 1993, LB 520, § 2.